Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202179-2804
Rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Purple Star Schools Act.

Laws 2021, LB5, § 4.
August 28, 2021